Illinois, session 104th, SB1242.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Central Management Services 5Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6adding Section 405-316 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 405/405-316 new)8    Sec. 405-316. Demolition and removal of State facilities. 9The Department shall, at least annually, review State 10facilities that are no longer in service, determine the status 11of those facilities, and determine which of those facilities 12need to be demolished. The Department shall annually submit a 13report to the Governor and the General Assembly on or before 14January 1 of each year regarding estimated costs for the 15demolition and removal of State facilities no longer in 16service.